Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201550-1208
Performance audit; committee; duties; office; duties.

(1) The committee shall, by majority vote, adopt requests for performance audit. The committee chairperson shall notify each requester of any action taken on his or her request.

(2) Before the office begins a performance audit, it shall notify in writing the agency director, the program director, when relevant, and the Governor that a performance audit will be conducted.

(3) Following notification, the office shall arrange an entrance conference to provide the agency with further information about the audit process. The agency director shall inform the agency staff, in writing, of the performance audit and shall instruct agency staff to cooperate fully with the office.

(4) After the entrance conference, the office shall conduct the research necessary to draft a scope statement for consideration by the committee. The scope statement shall identify the specific issues to be addressed in the audit. The committee shall, by majority vote, adopt, reject, or amend and adopt the scope statement prepared by the office.

(5) Once the committee has adopted a scope statement, the office shall develop an audit plan. The audit plan shall include a description of the research and audit methodologies to be employed and a projected deadline for completion of the office's report. The audit plan shall be submitted to the committee, and a majority vote shall be required for its approval. Upon approval of the audit plan, the agency shall be notified in writing of the specific scope of the audit and the projected deadline for completion of the office's report. If the office needs information from a political subdivision or entity thereof to effectively conduct a performance audit of an agency, the political subdivision or entity thereof shall provide information, on request, to the office.

(6) If the performance audit reveals a need to modify the scope statement or audit plan, the Legislative Auditor may request that the committee make revisions. A majority vote shall be required to revise the scope statement or audit plan. The agency shall be notified in writing of any revision to the scope statement or audit plan.

Laws 1992, LB 988, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 607, § 11;

Laws 2006, LB 956, § 8;

Laws 2013, LB39, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB538, § 4.
August 30, 2015
Angel Investment Tax Credit Act, see section 77-6301.

Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act, see section 77-5201.

Nebraska Advantage Act, see section 77-5701.

Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, see section 77-5901.

Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act, see section 77-5801.

Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act, see section 77-27,187.

Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act, see section 77-2901.

New Markets Job Growth Investment Act, see section 77-1101.